src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-kuarrud_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../..//generator-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kuárruđ: # ML checked

    kuárruđ+V+Inf: kuárruđ
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: korruđ

    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: korruum
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: korruuh
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuárroo
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kuárrojeen
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: korruuvettee
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: korruv
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: korrup
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: korruuvetteđ
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kuárrojeh

    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kuárrojim
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kuárrojih
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: korrui
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: korruim
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: korruid
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: korruin
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: korruim
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: korruid
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kuárrojii

    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: korruuččim
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: korruuččih
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: korruuččij
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: korruuččáim
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: korruuččáid
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: korruuččáin
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: korruuččijm
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: korruuččijd
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: korruuččii

#    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: korruužeem
#    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: korruužeeh
##    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: kuáruš
#    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: korruužeen
#    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: kuárušvettee
#    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: korruužává
#    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: korruužep
#    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: kuárušvetteđ
#    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: korruužeh

    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: korruu
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: korrum
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: korruuččii
#    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: korruužii
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: [kuárrojeijee, kuárrojijjee]
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: [korrum, koorrum] #Lene added koorrum
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: korrum
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: korruumin
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: korruumist
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: korruumân
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: korruudijn
    kuárruđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: korruuhánnáá

    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuárudâm
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kuárudah
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuárud
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kuárudeen
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kuárudvettee
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kuárudává
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kuárudeh

    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kuárudim
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kuárudij
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kuárudii
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: kuárudiččim
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: kuárudičij
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: kuárudižžeem
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: kuárudiš
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kuárud
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kuárudâm
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: kuárudižžii
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: kuárudâm
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: kuárudhánnáá
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: kuárudem
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: kuárudmân
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: kuárudmin
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: kuárudmist
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: kuáruddijn
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger+PxSg1: kuáruddijnân
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger+PxSg2: kuáruddijnâd
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger+PxSg3: kuáruddijnis
    kuárruđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: kuáruddijn
    kuárruđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuárustâm
    kuárruđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuáruttâm
    kuárruđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuáruškuáđám
